Utah statutes.
41-6a-406.   Statistical information regarding accidents -- Annual publication.

(1)  The department may analyze all accident reports.

(2) (a)  The department shall tabulate and publish statistical information as to the number and circumstances of traffic accidents.

(b)  The publication under Subsection (2)(a) shall be at least annually.

